browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX tM Y 32
SFX tM outre outre/n'q'd'l'm't's' foutre po:infi
SFX tM outre outant/n'q'd'l'm't's' foutre po:ppre
SFX tM outre outu/L'D'Q' foutre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tM outre outus/D'Q' foutre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tM outre outue/L'D'Q' foutre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tM outre outues/D'Q' foutre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tM outre ous/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tM outre out/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tM outre outons/n'q'l't' foutre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX tM outre outez/n'q'l'm' foutre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX tM outre outent/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX tM outre outais/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tM outre outait/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX tM outre outions/n'q'l't' foutre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX tM outre outiez/n'q'l'm' foutre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX tM outre outaient/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX tM outre outrai/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX tM outre outras/n'q'l'm't' foutre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX tM outre outra/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX tM outre outrons/n'q'l't' foutre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX tM outre outrez/n'q'l'm' foutre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX tM outre outront/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX tM outre outrais/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tM outre outrait/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:cond po:3sg
SFX tM outre outrions/n'q'l't' foutre po:cond po:1pl
SFX tM outre outriez/n'q'l'm' foutre po:cond po:2pl
SFX tM outre outraient/n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:cond po:3pl
SFX tM outre oute/j'n'q'l'm't's' foutre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX tM outre outes/n'q'l'm't' foutre po:spre po:2sg
SFX tM outre ous/n'l'm't' foutre po:impe po:2sg
SFX tM outre outons/n'l't' foutre po:impe po:1pl
SFX tM outre outez/n'l'm' foutre po:impe po:2pl

SFX tU Y 5
SFX tU istre istre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tistre po:infi
SFX tU istre issu/d'q' tistre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tU istre issus/d'q' tistre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tU istre issue/d'q' tistre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tU istre issues/d'q' tistre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl

SFX uA Y 46
SFX uA tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre po:infi
SFX uA tre tant/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre po:ppre
SFX uA tre tu/L'D'Q' tre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uA tre tus/D'Q' tre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uA tre tue/L'D'Q' tre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uA tre tues/D'Q' tre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uA ttre ts/j'n'q'l'm't' ttre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uA ttre t/n'q'l'm't's' ttre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX uA tre ts/j'n'q'l'm't' embatre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uA tre t/n'q'l'm't's' embatre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX uA tre tons/n'q'l't' tre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX uA tre tez/n'q'l'm' tre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX uA tre tent/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX uA tre tais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uA tre tait/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX uA tre tions/n'q'l't' tre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX uA tre tiez/n'q'l'm' tre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX uA tre taient/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX uA tre tis/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uA tre tit/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX uA tre tîmes/n'q'l't' tre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX uA tre tîtes/n'q'l'm' tre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX uA tre tirent/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX uA tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX uA tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX uA tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX uA tre trons/n'q'l't' tre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX uA tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX uA tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX uA tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uA tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:cond po:3sg
SFX uA tre trions/n'q'l't' tre po:cond po:1pl
SFX uA tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre po:cond po:2pl
SFX uA tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:cond po:3pl
SFX uA tre te/j'n'q'l'm't's' tre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX uA tre tes/n'q'l'm't' tre po:spre po:2sg
SFX uA tre tisse/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:simp po:1sg
SFX uA tre tisses/n'q'l'm't' tre po:simp po:2sg
SFX uA tre tît/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:simp po:3sg
SFX uA tre tissions/n'q'l't' tre po:simp po:1pl
SFX uA tre tissiez/n'q'l'm' tre po:simp po:2pl
SFX uA tre tissent/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:simp po:3pl
SFX uA tre s/n'l'm't' tre po:impe po:2sg
SFX uA tre ts/n'l'm't' embatre po:impe po:2sg
SFX uA tre tons/n'l't' tre po:impe po:1pl
SFX uA tre tez/n'l'm' tre po:impe po:2pl

SFX uC Y 43
SFX uC battre battre/n'q'd'l'm't's' battre po:infi
SFX uC battre battant/n'q'd'l'm't's' battre po:ppre
SFX uC battre battu/L'D'Q' battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uC battre battus/D'Q' battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uC battre battue/L'D'Q' battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uC battre battues/D'Q' battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uC battre bats/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre bat/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX uC battre battons/n'q'l't' battre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX uC battre battez/n'q'l'm' battre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX uC battre battent/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX uC battre battais/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battait/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX uC battre battions/n'q'l't' battre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX uC battre battiez/n'q'l'm' battre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX uC battre battaient/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX uC battre battis/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battit/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX uC battre battîmes/n'q'l't' battre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX uC battre battîtes/n'q'l'm' battre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX uC battre battirent/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrai/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX uC battre battras/n'q'l'm't' battre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX uC battre battra/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX uC battre battrons/n'q'l't' battre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX uC battre battrez/n'q'l'm' battre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX uC battre battront/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrais/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battrait/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:cond po:3sg
SFX uC battre battrions/n'q'l't' battre po:cond po:1pl
SFX uC battre battriez/n'q'l'm' battre po:cond po:2pl
SFX uC battre battraient/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:cond po:3pl
SFX uC battre batte/j'n'q'l'm't's' battre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX uC battre battes/n'q'l'm't' battre po:spre po:2sg
SFX uC battre battisse/j'n'q'l'm't' battre po:simp po:1sg
SFX uC battre battisses/n'q'l'm't' battre po:simp po:2sg
SFX uC battre battît/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:simp po:3sg
SFX uC battre battissions/n'q'l't' battre po:simp po:1pl
SFX uC battre battissiez/n'q'l'm' battre po:simp po:2pl
SFX uC battre battissent/n'q'l'm't's' battre po:simp po:3pl
SFX uC battre bats/n'l'm't' battre po:impe po:2sg
SFX uC battre battons/n'l't' battre po:impe po:1pl
SFX uC battre battez/n'l'm' battre po:impe po:2pl
