browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
abattre/uA() po:v3_it_q__a
battre/uA() po:v3_itxq__a
combattre/uA() po:v3_itx___a
contrebattre/uA() po:v3__t____a
contrefoutre/tM() po:v3____p_e_
débattre/uA() po:v3_itxq__a
ébattre/uC() po:v3____p_e_
embatre/uA() po:v3__t____a
embattre/uA() po:v3__t____a
foutre/tM() po:v3_it_q__a
rabattre/uA() po:v3_it_q__a
rebattre/uA() po:v3__t____a
refoutre/tM() po:v3_it_q__a
soubattre/uA() po:v3__t___zz
tistre/tU() po:v3_it____a
